Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1005
Gamblers Assistance Program; created;
duties.

The
Gamblers Assistance Program is created. The program shall:

(1) Contract with
providers of problem gambling treatment services to Nebraska consumers;

(2) Promote public
awareness of the existence of problem gambling and the availability of treatment
services;

(3) Evaluate the existence and scope of problem gambling in Nebraska
and its consequences through means and methods determined by the commission;
and

(4)
Perform such other duties and provide such other services as the commission
determines.

Laws 2013, LB6, § 5.